USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn.dix
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/U__p">
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Une</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Une</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJe</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJe</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJake</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJake</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJameM_se</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJameM_se</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uJapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uma</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uma</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umane </l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umane </l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umheM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umheM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umake</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umake</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umameM_se</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umameM_se</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>erA</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>umhArA</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Added parsarg:kI -->
<e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>uma<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="wU"><i>w</i><par n="w/U__p"/></e>
